Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2939
Investment program; website.

The investment program shall maintain a website for access by the public. At a minimum, such website shall contain reports published by the investment program or the commission, rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act, and information for obtaining financial assistance from the investment program.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 39.
July 18, 2026